Utah statutes.
16-10a-402.   Reserved name.
(1)  Any person may apply for the reservation of a name by delivering to the
division for filing an application setting forth the name and address of the
applicant and the name proposed to be reserved.  If the division finds that
the name applied for would be available for use as a corporate name under
Section 16-10a-401, the division shall reserve the name for the applicant for
a 120-day period. Any person which has in effect a reservation of a name
permitted by this Subsection may renew the reservation by delivering to the
division for filing prior to expiration of the reservation a renewal
application for reservation, which complies with the requirements of this
Subsection (1).  When filed, the renewal application for reservation renews
the reservation for a period of 120 days from the date of filing.
(2)  The applicant for a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another
person by delivering to the division a notice of the transfer signed by the
applicant for which the name was reserved and specifying the reserved name,
the name of the holder of the name, and the name and address of the
transferee.
(3)  A name reservation does not authorize the applicant to use the name
until:
(a)  the name is registered as a trade name under Section 42-2-5;
(b)  articles of incorporation which bear the name are filed with the
division; or
(c)  an application for authority to transact business in this state under the
name has been filed with the division pursuant to Part 15 of this chapter.
